District of Columbia statutes.
29-102.12

Fees.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall adopt rules, to establish or revise fees for entity filings authorized to be delivered to the Mayor for filing under this title and for copying and certifying a copy of any entity filing under this title.

(b)

There shall be no fee for filing a registered agent’s statement of resignation.

(c)

The withdrawal under § 29-102.04 of a filed record before it is effective or the correction of a filed record under § 29-102.05 shall not entitle the person on whose behalf the record was filed to a refund of the filing fee.

(d)

The rules proposed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-305, § 2(d), 60 DCR 2735

History

This section is referenced in § 29-102.13.

Section References

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-305 substituted “deemed approved” for “deemed disapproved” in (d).

Effect of Amendments